District of Columbia statutes.
16-3546

Usurping corporate franchise; judgment.

Where a quo warranto proceeding is against persons acting as a corporation without being legally incorporated, the judgment against the defendants shall be that they be perpetually restrained and enjoined from the commission or continuance of the acts complained of.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 603, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 563, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)
1981 Ed., § 16-3546.
1973 Ed., § 16-3546.